District of Columbia statutes.
42-2141

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Affordable housing unit” means a unit of housing that is offered for rent or for sale for residential occupancy and as a result of a federal or District subsidy is made available and affordable to households whose income levels are less than or equal to 120% of the area median income.

(2)

“Area median income” means:

(A)

For a household of 4 persons, the area median income for a household of 4 persons in the Washington Metropolitan Statistical Area as set forth in the periodic calculation provided by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development;

(B)

For a household of 3 persons, 90% of the area median income for a household of 4 persons;

(C)

For a household of 2 persons, 80% of the area median income for a household of 4 persons;

(D)

For a household of one person, 70% of the area median income for a household of 4 persons; and

(E)

For a household of more than 4 persons, the area median income for a household of 4 persons, increased by 10% for each household member exceeding 4 persons (for example, the area median income for a family of 5 shall be 110% of the area median income for a family of 4; the area median income for a household of 6 shall be 120% of the area median income for a family of 4).

(3)

“Extremely low-income” means a household income equal to 30% or less of the area median income.

(4)

“Homeless” means a person:

(A)

Who is lacking a fixed, regular residence that provides safe housing and the financial means to acquire such a residence immediately; or

(B)

Whose primary night-time residence is:

(i)

A supervised publicly or privately operated shelter or transitional housing facility designed to provide temporary living accommodations; or

(ii)

A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.

(5)

“Low-income” means a household income equal to, or less than, 80% of the area median income and greater than 50% of the area median income.

(6)

“Very low-income” means a household income equal to, or less than, 50% of the area median income and greater than 30% of the area median income.

History

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 2092, 59 DCR 8025